North Carolina, session 2025, SB286.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. G.S. 90-171.27 reads as rewritten:
"§ 90-171.27. Expenses payable from fees collected by Board.
(a) All salaries, compensation, and expenses incurred or allowed for the purposes of
carrying out this Article shall be paid by the Board exclusively out of the fees received by the
Board as authorized by this Article, or funds received from other sources. In no case shall any
salary, expense, or other obligation of the Board be charged against the treasury of the State of
North Carolina. All moneys and receipts shall be kept in a special fund by and for the use of the
Board for the exclusive purpose of carrying out the provisions of this Article.
(b) The schedule of fees shall not exceed the following rates:
Application for examination leading to certificate and license as
registered nurse .................................................................................. $75.00$150.00
Application for certificate and license as registered nurse by
endorsement ......................................................................................... 150.00300.00
Application for each re-examination leading to certificate and license as
registered nurse ...................................................................................... 75.00150.00
Renewal of license to practice as registered nurse (two-year period) ........... 100.00200.00
Reinstatement of lapsed license to practice as a registered nurse and
renewal fee ........................................................................................... 180.00280.00
Application for examination leading to certificate and license as licensed
practical nurse by examination .............................................................. 75.00150.00
Application for certificate and license as licensed practical nurse by
endorsement ......................................................................................... 150.00300.00
Application for each re-examination leading to certificate and license as
licensed practical nurse .......................................................................... 75.00150.00
Renewal of license to practice as a licensed practical nurse (two-year
period) .................................................................................................. 100.00200.00
Reinstatement of lapsed license to practice as a licensed practical nurse
and renewal fee .................................................................................... 180.00280.00
Application fee for retired registered nurse status or retired licensed
practical nurse status .................. ………………………………………50.00100.00
*S286-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
Reinstatement of retired registered nurse to practice as a registered nurse
or a retired licensed practical nurse to practice as a licensed
practical nurse (two-year period) ......................................................... 100.00200.00
Reasonable charge for duplication to recover cost of other services and materials.
A fee for an item listed in this schedule shall not increase from one year to the next by more
than twenty percent (20%).
(c) No refund of fees will be made.
(d) The Board may assess costs of disciplinary action against a nurse found in violation
of the North Carolina Nursing Practice Act."
SECTION 2. The North Carolina Board of Nursing may adopt temporary rules to
implement the provisions of this act.
SECTION 3. This act becomes effective October 1, 2025, and applies to
applications, renewals, and reinstatements for licensure on or after that date.
Page 2 Senate Bill 286-First Edition